District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-101.01

Definitions.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 101, 44 DCR 777
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(x), 58 DCR 1720

History

1981 Ed., § 41-151.1.

Prior Codifications

For Uniform Partnership Act of 2010, see, now, § 29-601.01 et seq.

Applicability date of D.C. Law 18-378: Section 5 of D.C. Law 18-378, as amended by section 7082 of D.C. Law 19-21, provided: “Sec. 5. Applicability. This act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.”.

Section 89(a) of D.C. Law 19-171 corrected the law reference in D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(x).

Editor's Notes